Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 5. Nurse Licensure Compact
§ 1647i. Section 1647i effective February 1, 2022. Oversight, dispute resolution, and enforcement.

Oversight.

Each party state shall enforce this Compact and take all actions necessary and appropriate to effectuate this Compact’s purposes and intent.

The Commission shall be entitled to receive service of process in any proceeding that may affect the powers, responsibilities, or actions of the Commission and shall have standing to intervene in such a proceeding for all purposes. Failure to provide service of process in such proceeding to the Commission shall render a judgment or order void as to the Commission, this Compact, or promulgated rules.

Default, technical assistance, and termination.

If the Commission determines that a party state has defaulted in the performance of its obligations or responsibilities under this Compact or the promulgated rules, the Commission shall:

provide written notice to the defaulting state and other party states of the nature of the default, the proposed means of curing the default, or any other action to be taken by the Commission; and

provide remedial training and specific technical assistance regarding the default.

If a state in default fails to cure the default, the defaulting state’s membership in this Compact may be terminated upon an affirmative vote of a majority of the administrators, and all rights, privileges, and benefits conferred by this Compact may be terminated on the effective date of termination. A cure of the default does not relieve the offending state of obligations or liabilities incurred during the period of default.

Termination of membership in this Compact shall be imposed only after all other means of securing compliance have been exhausted. Notice of intent to suspend or terminate shall be given by the Commission to the governor of the defaulting state and to the executive officer of the defaulting state’s licensing board and each of the party states.

A state whose membership in this Compact has been terminated is responsible for all assessments, obligations, and liabilities incurred through the effective date of termination, including obligations that extend beyond the effective date of termination.

The Commission shall not bear any costs related to a state that is found to be in default or whose membership in this Compact has been terminated unless agreed upon in writing between the Commission and the defaulting state.

The defaulting state may appeal the action of the Commission by petitioning the U.S. District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal district in which the Commission has its principal offices. The prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney’s fees.

Dispute resolution.

Upon request by a party state, the Commission shall attempt to resolve disputes related to the Compact that arise among party states and between party and non-party states.

The Commission shall promulgate a rule providing for both mediation and binding dispute resolution for disputes, as appropriate.

In the event the Commission cannot resolve disputes among party states arising under this Compact:

The party states may submit the issues in dispute to an arbitration panel, which will be composed of individuals appointed by the Compact administrator in each of the affected party states and an individual mutually agreed upon by the Compact administrators of all the party states involved in the dispute.

The decision of a majority of the arbitrators shall be final and binding.

Enforcement.

The Commission, in the reasonable exercise of its discretion, shall enforce the provisions and rules of this Compact.

By majority vote, the Commission may initiate legal action in the U.S. District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal district in which the Commission has its principal offices against a party state that is in default to enforce compliance with the provisions of this Compact and its promulgated rules and bylaws. The relief sought may include both injunctive relief and damages. In the event judicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney’s fees.

The remedies herein shall not be the exclusive remedies of the Commission. The Commission may pursue any other remedies available under federal or state law.

HISTORY:

Added

2021, No. 64

, § 1, eff. Feb. 1, 2022.

§ 1647j. Section 1647j effective February 1, 2022. Effective date, withdrawal, and amendment.

This Compact shall become effective and binding on the earlier of the date of legislative enactment of this Compact into law by not fewer than 26 states or December 31, 2018. All party states to this Compact that also were parties to the prior Nurse Licensure Compact superseded by this Compact (“Prior Compact”) shall be deemed to have withdrawn from the Prior Compact within six months after the effective date of this Compact.

Each party state to this Compact shall continue to recognize a nurse’s multistate licensure privilege to practice in that party state issued under the Prior Compact until such party state has withdrawn from the Prior Compact.

Any party state may withdraw from this Compact by enacting a statute repealing the same. A party state’s withdrawal shall not take effect until six months after enactment of the repealing statute.

A party state’s withdrawal or termination shall not affect the continuing requirement of the withdrawing or terminated state’s licensing board to report adverse actions and significant investigations occurring prior to the effective date of such withdrawal or termination.

Nothing contained in this Compact shall be construed to invalidate or prevent any nurse licensure agreement or other cooperative arrangement between a party state and a non-party state that is made in accordance with the other provisions of this Compact.

This Compact may be amended by the party states. No amendment to this Compact shall become effective and binding upon the party states unless and until it is enacted into the laws of all party states.

Representatives of non-party states to this Compact shall be invited to participate in the activities of the Commission, on a nonvoting basis, prior to the adoption of this Compact by all states.

HISTORY:

Added

2021, No. 64

, § 1, eff. Feb. 1, 2022.

§ 1647k. Section 1647k effective February 1, 2022. Construction and severability.

This Compact shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes thereof. The provisions of this Compact shall be severable, and if any phrase, clause, sentence, or provision of this Compact is declared to be contrary to the constitution of any party state or of the United States, or if the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person, or circumstance is held invalid, the validity of the remainder of this Compact and the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person, or circumstance shall not be affected thereby. If this Compact shall be held to be contrary to the constitution of any party state, this Compact shall remain in full force and effect as to the remaining party states and in full force and effect as to the party state affected as to all severable matters.

HISTORY:

Added

2021, No. 64

, § 1, eff. Feb. 1, 2022.

§ 1648. Section 1648 effective February 1, 2022. Administration of the Nurse Licensure Compact.

The Vermont State Board of Nursing shall have the power to:

oversee the administration and enforcement of the Nurse Licensure Compact within the State of Vermont;

recover from a nurse practicing under the provisions of the Nurse Licensure Compact the cost of investigation and disposition of a case resulting in adverse action taken against that nurse; and

conduct a background check, prior to issuing a multistate license under the provisions of the Nurse Licensure Compact, that includes a fingerprint-based check of State and federal criminal history databases, as authorized by 28 C.F.R. § 20.33.

The Executive Director of the Vermont State Board of Nursing or designee shall be the administrator (State Administrator) of the Nurse Licensure Compact for the State of Vermont pursuant to subdivision 1647g(b)(1) of this subchapter.

The State Administrator shall promptly, and prior to a vote of the Commission, notify the Commissioner of Finance and Management if the Commission proposes to pledge the credit of the State of Vermont under subdivision 1647g(h)(3) of this subchapter or in any way proposes to impose liability on the State of Vermont for an amount equal to or in excess of $100,000.00.

The Vermont State Board of Nursing may:

adopt rules necessary to implement and enforce the provisions of this subchapter within the State of Vermont; and

take disciplinary action against the practice privilege of a nurse practicing within the State of Vermont under the provisions of the Nurse Licensure Compact, which may include disciplinary action based on disciplinary action taken against the nurse’s license by another party state to the Nurse Licensure Compact.

Nothing in this subchapter shall supersede or abridge State labor laws.

HISTORY:

Added

2021, No. 64

, § 1, eff. Feb. 1, 2022.